Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-2,110
Permit to appropriate water for instream flows; application; requirements.

Following notice and a public hearing, any natural resources district or the Game and Parks Commission may file with the Chief Water Officer an application for a permit to appropriate water for instream flows in each stream segment identified pursuant to section 46-2,109. The application shall include the locations on the stream at which the need for instream flows begins and ends and the time of year when instream flows are most critical. The application shall also provide a detailed description of the amount of water necessary to provide adequate instream flows.

Laws 1984, LB 1106, § 26;

Laws 1985, LB 102, § 15;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 142;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 125.